Maine, session 132, LD850.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §161, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 419, §1 and reallocated by PL
2023, c. 1, Pt. A, §25, is amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
The Secretary of State may adopt rules to administer this section. Rules adopted under
this paragraph must include, but are not limited to, rules governing the transaction fees
charged by the kiosk vendor. Rules adopted under this paragraph are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §651-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 539, §2, is
amended to read:
2. Notification of release or update. The lienholder shall use the electronic lien titling
program to notify the Secretary of State when a lien is released or updated; and
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §651-A, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 539, §2, is
amended to read:
3. Paper copy. The lienholder may request a paper copy of the certificate of title.;
and
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §651-A, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Fee. The lienholder shall pay a fee of $1.00 per electronic lien transaction, which
must be deposited into the Motor Vehicle Services Fund established under section 159.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §754, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 498, §18, is further
amended to read:
4. Vehicle or vehicle part disposal. Impounded vehicles and vehicle parts that are
unclaimed, recovered after theft or unidentifiable become the property of the Secretary of
State. The Secretary of State shall dispose of those vehicles and vehicle parts in the
following manner.
A. Within 10 days after impoundment, the Secretary of State shall notify by registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, the last known owner and all lienholders of
Page 1 - 132LR0515(03)

record. The notice must describe the year, make, model and vehicle identification
number, if known. The notice must state that failure of the owner or lienholder to
exercise the owner's or the lienholder's right to reclaim the vehicle or vehicle part
within 30 days from receipt of notice means the vehicle or vehicle part is abandoned
and becomes the property of the Secretary of State. An owner or lienholder claiming
ownership under this paragraph must take possession of the vehicle or vehicle part
within 30 days from receipt of notice to reclaim the vehicle or vehicle part.
B. After expiration of the 30-day notice period, the Secretary of State may dispose of
the vehicle at public auction or report the vehicle as abandoned under Title 33, chapter
45.
C. The Secretary of State may dispose of the vehicle or vehicle part in a manner
considered appropriate by the Secretary of State, including, but not limited to, selling
the vehicle or vehicle part. Any proceeds from a sale of a vehicle or vehicle part under
this paragraph must be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Services Fund established under
section 159.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §851, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Electronic temporary registration plate program. "Electronic temporary
registration plate program" means an electronic program that permits the creation of a
temporary registration plate and the maintenance of temporary registration plate
information.
Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §954-A, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Electronic temporary registration plate program. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State may use, but may not require the
use of, an electronic temporary registration plate program. If the Secretary of State uses an
electronic temporary registration plate program under this subsection, the Secretary of State
may adopt rules to implement and administer the program. Rules adopted under this
subsection must include, but are not limited to, rules governing the process by which a
dealer elects to participate in or stop participating in the electronic temporary registration
plate program. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 8. 29-A MRSA §954-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 126, §1 and
reallocated by PL 2023, c. 257, §7, is further amended to read:
2. Payment of fee for temporary registration plate. The fee for a temporary
registration plate is $1 $2.00 per plate, $1.00 of which must be deposited into the Motor
Vehicle Services Fund established under section 159 to establish and maintain an electronic
temporary registration plate program. A purchaser may operate the motor vehicle or trailer
with a temporary registration plate for a period of 30 consecutive days without payment of
a regular fee. At the end of this initial period, a resident who is unable to comply with the
requirements of chapter 7 or a nonresident who has applied for but has not yet received a
registration certificate from a home state may request the Secretary of State to extend this
period without charge for an additional 20 days.
Sec. 9. Effective date. That section of this Act that enacts the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 29-A, section 651-A, subsection 4 and that section that amends Title 29-A,
section 954-A, subsection 2 take effect January 1, 2026.
Page 2 - 132LR0515(03)